California statutes. Elections Code
(a) If the boundaries of a city expand by the addition of new territory, including through annexation of unincorporated territory or consolidation with another city, the council shall add that new territory to the nearest existing council district without changing the boundaries of other council district boundaries.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the council may adopt new boundaries for each council district pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) if the boundaries of the city expand by the addition of new territory and if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) There are more than four years
 until the council is next required to redistrict pursuant to Section 21601.

(2) The population of the new territory being annexed or consolidated is greater than 25 percent of the city’s population, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 32.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21605.

(a) After redistricting or districting, a council shall not adopt new council district boundaries until after the next federal decennial census, except under the following circumstances:

(1) A court orders the council to redistrict.

(2) The council is settling a legal claim that its council district boundaries violate the United States Constitution, the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.), or this article.

(3) The boundaries of the city change by the addition of territory pursuant to Section 21603 or by the subtraction of territory.

(4) The number of council members elected by districts or from districts is increased or decreased.

(5) An independent redistricting commission is established pursuant to Section 23003 to adopt new council districts between federal decennial censuses and the districts being replaced were adopted by the city council.

(b) This section does not prohibit a council from adopting council districts between federal decennial censuses if the council is adopting council districts for the first time, including when a city adopts council districts for the purpose of transitioning from electing its council members in at-large elections to elections by districts or from districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 33.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21606.

(a) The term of office of any council member who has been elected and whose term of office has not expired shall not be affected by any change in the boundaries of the district from which the council member was elected and that member shall continue to represent the constituents residing in the district boundaries from which the member was elected for the duration of that term of office. This section does not prevent a city council from assigning a city elected official or city official to provide constituent services to residents of an area that is temporarily not represented by a council member due to redistricting.

(b) At the first election for council members in each city following
 adoption of the boundaries of council districts, excluding a special election to fill a vacancy or a recall election, a council member shall be elected for each district under the new district plan that has the same district number as a district whose incumbent’s term is due to expire. This subdivision does not apply when a city transitions from at-large to district-based elections.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a person is not eligible to hold office as a member of a city council unless that person meets the requirements of Section 201 of the Elections Code and Section 34882 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 34.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Chartered Cities [21620. - 21630.]

21620.

This article applies to a charter city that elects members of the city’s legislative body by districts or from districts, as those terms are defined in Section 34871 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 39.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21621.

Following a city’s decision to elect its council using district-based elections, or following each federal decennial census for a city whose council is already elected using district-based elections, the council shall, by ordinance or resolution, adopt boundaries for all of the council districts of the city pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 40.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21623.

(a) If the boundaries of a city expand by the addition of new territory, including through annexation of unincorporated territory or consolidation with another city, the council shall add that new territory to the nearest existing council district without changing the boundaries of other council district boundaries.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the council may adopt new boundaries for each council district pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) if the boundaries of the city expand by the addition of new territory and if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) There are more than four years
 until the council is next required to redistrict pursuant to Section 21621.

(2) The population of the new territory being annexed or consolidated is greater than 25 percent of the city’s population as determined by the most recent federal decennial census.

(c) This section does not apply to a charter city that has adopted, by ordinance or in its city charter, a different standard for adding new territory to existing council districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 42.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21625.

(a) After redistricting or districting, a council shall not adopt new council district boundaries until after the next federal decennial census, except under the following circumstances:

(1) A court orders the council to redistrict.

(2) The council is settling a legal claim that its council district boundaries violate the United States Constitution, the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.), or this article.

(3) The boundaries of the city change by the addition of territory pursuant to Section 21623 or by the subtraction of territory.

(4) The number of council members elected by districts or from districts is increased or decreased.

(5) An independent redistricting commission, whose members are not directly appointed by the legislative body or an elected official of the local jurisdiction, is established to adopt new council districts between federal decennial censuses and the districts being replaced were adopted by the city council.

(b) This section does not prohibit a council from adopting council districts between federal decennial censuses if the council is adopting council districts for the first time, including when a city adopts council districts for the purpose of transitioning from electing its council members in at-large elections to elections
 by districts or from districts.

(c) This section does not apply to a charter city that has adopted different rules for mid-cycle redistricting in its city charter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 43.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21626.

(a) The term of office of any council member who has been elected and whose term of office has not expired shall not be affected by any change in the boundaries of the district from which the council member was elected and that member shall continue to represent the constituents residing in the district boundaries from which the member was elected for the duration of that term of office. This section does not prevent a city council from assigning a city elected official or city official to provide constituent services to residents of an area that is temporarily not represented by a council member due to redistricting.

(b) At the first election for council members in each city following
 adoption of the boundaries of council districts, excluding a special election to fill a vacancy or a recall election, a council member shall be elected for each district under the new district plan that has the same district number as a district whose incumbent’s term is due to expire. This subdivision does not apply when a city transitions from at-large to district-based elections.

(c) For a city employing both a primary and a general election, a change in the boundaries of a council district shall not be made between the direct primary election and the general election.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (a), a person is not eligible to hold office as a member of a city council unless that person meets the requirements of Section 201 of the Elections Code and Section 34882 of the
 Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 44.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

21630.

If a council assigns the responsibility to recommend or to adopt new district boundaries to a hybrid or independent redistricting commission as defined in Section 23000, the charter city remains subject to the redistricting deadlines, requirements, and restrictions that apply to the council under this article and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100), unless otherwise exempted by law. A redistricting commission described in this section may perform the duties required of a city council under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 49.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Special Districts [22000. - 22001.]

22000.

(a) Following a special district’s decision to elect its board of directors using district-based elections, or following each federal decennial census for a special district whose board of directors is already elected using district-based elections, the board of directors shall, by resolution, adopt boundaries for all of the divisions of the special district pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100).

(b) The resolution specified in subdivision (a) shall be adopted by a vote of not less than a majority of the directors.

(c) At the time of, or after, any annexation of territory to the district, the board of directors shall
 designate, by resolution, the division of which the annexed territory shall be a part.

(d) Except as provided in Section 21140, no change in division boundaries may be made within 180 days preceding the election of any director.

(e) (1) A change in division boundaries shall not affect the term of office of any director.

(2) If division boundaries are adjusted, the director of the division whose boundaries have been adjusted shall continue to be the director of the division bearing the number of that division as formerly comprised until the office becomes vacant by means of term expiration or otherwise, whether or not the director is a resident within the boundaries of the division as adjusted. The director
 shall continue to represent the constituents residing in the district boundaries from which the director was elected for the duration of that term of office. This section does not prevent a board from assigning a director or special district official to provide constituent services to residents of an area that is temporarily not represented by a director due to redistricting.

(f) The successor to the office in a division whose boundaries have been adjusted shall be a resident and voter of that division.

(g) A district is not required to adjust the boundaries of any divisions pursuant to this section until after the 2000 federal decennial census.

(h) This section shall not be construed to prohibit or restrict a district
 from adjusting the boundaries of any divisions pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) whenever the board of directors of the district determines by a two-thirds vote of the board that a sufficient change in population has occurred that makes
 it desirable in the opinion of the board to adjust the boundaries of any divisions, or whenever any territory is added by or excluded from the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 50.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.

This chapter and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 21100) do not apply to special districts in which only landowners vote for directors or whose directors are all elected at large or appointed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 52.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Advisory and Independent Redistricting Commissions [23000. - 23004.]

23000.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Advisory redistricting commission” means a body that recommends to a legislative body placement of the district boundaries for that legislative body.

(b) “Family member” means a spouse, parent, sibling, child, or in-law.

(c) “Hybrid redistricting commission” means a body that recommends to a legislative body two or more maps for the placement of the district boundaries for that legislative body, where the legislative body must adopt one of those maps without modification, except as may
 be required to comply with state or federal law.

(d) “Independent redistricting commission” means a body, other than a legislative body, that is empowered to adopt the district boundaries of a legislative body.

(e) “Legislative body” means a county board of supervisors, a city council of a general law city, a governing board of a school district, a governing board of a community college district, or an elected governing board of a special district.

(f) “Local jurisdiction” means a county, general law city, school district, community college district, or special district. “Local jurisdiction” does not include a charter city.

(g) “Redistricting” means either
 districting or redistricting.

(h) “Spouse” means a spouse or registered domestic partner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 90, Sec. 28.   (AB 1276)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23001.

A local jurisdiction may establish by resolution, ordinance, or charter amendment an independent redistricting commission, a hybrid redistricting commission, or an advisory redistricting commission composed of residents of the local jurisdiction to change the legislative body’s district boundaries or to recommend to the legislative body changes to those district boundaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 462, Sec. 2.   (SB 1018)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23002.

(a) This section applies to advisory redistricting commissions.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the local jurisdiction may prescribe the manner in which members are appointed to the commission, provided that the commissioners are not appointed by the legislative body or an elected official of the local jurisdiction.

(c) A person who is an elected official of the local jurisdiction, or a family member, staff member, or paid campaign staff of an elected official of the local jurisdiction, shall not be appointed to serve on the commission.

(d) A local
 jurisdiction may impose additional requirements or restrictions on the commission, members of the commission, or applicants to the commission in excess of those prescribed by this section.

(e) The commission is subject to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) and the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 54.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23003.

(a) This section applies to hybrid redistricting commissions and independent redistricting commissions.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the local jurisdiction may prescribe the manner in which members are appointed to the commission, provided that the jurisdiction uses an application process open to all eligible residents and provided that the commissioners are not appointed by the legislative body or an elected official of the local jurisdiction.

(c) A person shall not be appointed to serve on the commission if the person or any family member of the person has been elected or appointed to, or been a candidate for, an
 elective office of the local jurisdiction in the eight years preceding the person’s application.

(d) A person shall not be appointed to serve on the commission if either of the following applies:

(1) The person or the person’s spouse has done any of the following in the eight years preceding the person’s application:

(A) Served as an officer of, employee of, or paid consultant to, a campaign committee or a candidate for elective office of the local jurisdiction.

(B) Served as an officer of, employee of, or paid consultant to, a political party or as an elected or appointed member of a political party central committee.

(C) Served as a staff member or a consultant to, or who has contracted with, a currently serving elected officer of the local jurisdiction.

(D) Been registered to lobby the local jurisdiction.

(E) Contributed five hundred dollars ($500) or more in a year to any candidate for an elective office of the local jurisdiction. The local jurisdiction may adjust this amount by the cumulative change in the California Consumer Price Index, or its successor, in every year ending in zero.

(2) A family member of the person, other than the person’s spouse, has done any of the following in the four years preceding the person’s application:

(A) Served as an
 officer of, employee of, or paid consultant to, a campaign committee or a candidate for elective office of the local jurisdiction.

(B) Served as an officer of, employee of, or paid consultant to, a political party or as an elected or appointed member of a political party central committee.

(C) Served as a staff member of or consultant to, or has contracted with, a currently serving elected officer of the local jurisdiction.

(D) Been registered to lobby the local jurisdiction.

(E) Contributed five hundred dollars ($500) or more in a year to any candidate for an elective office of the local jurisdiction. The local jurisdiction may adjust this amount by the
 cumulative change in the California Consumer Price Index, or its successor, in every year ending in zero.

(e) A member of the commission shall not do any of the following:

(1) While serving on the commission, endorse, work for,
 volunteer for, or make a campaign contribution to, a candidate for an elective office of the local jurisdiction.

(2) Be a candidate for an elective office of the local jurisdiction if any of the following is true:

(A) Less than five years has elapsed since the date of the member’s appointment to the commission.

(B) The election for that office will be conducted using district boundaries that were adopted by the commission on which the member served, and those district boundaries have not been subsequently readopted by a commission after the end of the member’s term on the commission.

(C) The election for that office will be conducted using district boundaries
 that were adopted by a legislative body pursuant to a recommendation by the commission on which the member served, and those district boundaries have not been subsequently readopted by a legislative body pursuant to a recommendation by a commission after the end of the member’s term on the commission.

(3) For four years commencing with the date of the person’s appointment to the commission:

(A) Accept employment as a staff member of, or consultant to, an elected official or candidate for elective office of the local jurisdiction.

(B) Receive a noncompetitively bid contract with the local jurisdiction.

(C) Register as a lobbyist for the local jurisdiction.

(4) For two years commencing with the date of the person’s appointment to the commission, accept an appointment to an office of the local jurisdiction.

(f) The commission shall not be comprised entirely of members who are registered to vote with the same political party preference.

(g) Each member of the commission shall be a designated employee in the conflict of interest code for the commission pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 87300) of Chapter 7 of Title 9 of the Government Code.

(h) The commission is subject to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) and the
 California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(i) The commission shall be subject to the same redistricting deadlines, requirements, and restrictions that would otherwise apply to a legislative body. A local jurisdiction may also impose additional requirements and restrictions on the commission, on members of the commission, or on applicants to the commission in excess of those prescribed by this section.

(j) The commission shall publish a map of the proposed new district boundaries and make that map available to the public for at least seven days before that map may be adopted. The commission shall hold at least three public hearings preceding the hearing at which the new boundaries are adopted.

(k) The commission shall not draw districts for the purpose of favoring or discriminating against a political party or an incumbent or political candidate.

(l) District boundaries adopted by an independent redistricting commission or adopted by a legislative body from
 recommendations provided by a hybrid redistricting commission, shall not be altered by the legislative body or the commission until after the next federal decennial census occurs, unless those boundaries have been invalidated by a final judgment or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(m) For the purposes of subdivisions (c) and (d), “local jurisdiction” does not include a local jurisdiction that contracts with a county independent redistricting commission pursuant to Section 23004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 343, Sec. 55.   (AB 764)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23004.

A local jurisdiction, except for a county, may contract with a county in which the local jurisdiction is partially or wholly located that has established an independent redistricting commission to have that commission adopt the local jurisdiction’s election district boundaries. The county independent redistricting commission shall hold at least three public hearings in the local jurisdiction before adopting those boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 462, Sec. 5.   (SB 1018)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

